North Dakota, session 69, HB1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 23-27-07 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. The following licensed ambulance services are exempt from this section:
a. Licensed ambulance services that are county owned.
b. Licensed ambulance services that are city owned.
c. Licensed ambulance services that are part of a joint powers agreement with a
city or county-owned ambulance.
d. Licensed ambulance services owned by tribal or federal government.
e. Licensed ambulance services owned and operated by a hospital.
f. Existing rural ambulance service districts organized pursuant tounder chapter
11-28.3.
Page No. 1 25.1053.01000